Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Innovative Grant Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the  General Fund. All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated
to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission for the purposes of making grants as part of  the
Innovative Grant Program described in section 2 of this 2021 Act. The fund shall  consist of
moneys appropriated to the commission  by the Legislative Assembly for purposes of the
grants.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall establish and administer
the Innovative Grant Program as described in this section.
(2) Using funds in the Innovative Grant Fund described in section 1 of this 2021 Act,  the
commission shall award grants to programs that:
(a) Demonstrate strong potential to have positive impacts on public safety;
(b) Can produce measurable outcomes;
(c) Have the potential  to benefit the entire state, either through immediate impact or
through potential reproducibility after an initial pilot period; and
(d) Demonstrate coordination with local public safety coordinating councils.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section. The rules
must include, but are not limited to:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant  applications and distributing grant
funds; and
(b) A process for evaluating the efficacy of programs receiving grants under this  section.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter , Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5005), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is increased by $1,000,000,
for deposit into the Innovative Grant Fund established by section 1 of this 2021 Act for the
purpose of funding the Innovative Grant Program described in section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission from the Innovative Grant
Fund established by section 1 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2049 (HB 2049-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2049 (HB 2049-A) Page 2